Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13-101A of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The State Department of Education shall develop standards to
implement the least restrictive environment requirements in the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA) to ensure
students with special needs are not unnecessarily excluded from the
classroom.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11709 AQH 12/12/24


Req. No. 11709 Page 1